test/src/morphology/N-okno_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - окно M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: окно́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: окно́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: окна́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: окне́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: окну́
      окно+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: окно́м
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: о́кна
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: о́кна
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: о́кон
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: о́кнах
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: о́кнам
      окно+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: о́кнами
